Hawaii statutes.
§134-15 Restriction of materials for
manufacture of pistols or revolvers. (a) It shall be unlawful for any
person, including a licensed manufacturer, licensed importer, or licensed
dealer, to possess, sell, or deliver any pistol or revolver the frame or
receiver of which is a die casting of zinc alloy which has a melting
temperature of less than 800 degrees Fahrenheit.

(b) This section shall not apply to any pistol
or revolver duly registered prior to July 1, 1975, pursuant to section
134-3 or to any antique pistol or revolver. [L 1988, c 275, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next